Hawaii statutes.
[§414-15] Correcting filed document.
(a) A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a document filed by the
department director if the document:

(1) Contains an incorrect statement; or

(2) Was defectively executed, attested, sealed,
verified, or acknowledged.

(b) A document is corrected by:

(1) Preparing articles of correction that:

(A) Describe the document (including its
filing date) or attach a copy of it to the articles;

(B) Specify the incorrect statement and the
reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the execution was defective; and

(C) Correct the incorrect statement or
defective execution; and

(2) Delivering the articles of correction to the
department director for filing.

(c) Articles of correction are effective on
the effective date of the document they correct except as to persons relying on
the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those
persons, articles of correction are effective when filed. [L 2000, c 244, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next